Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 9

Actions by Partners

61-3-901. Direct action by partner.

Subject to subsection (b), a partner may maintain a direct action against another partner or the limited partnership, with or without an accounting as to the limited partnership's activities and affairs, to enforce the partner's rights and otherwise protect the partner's interests, including rights and interests under the partnership agreement or this chapter or arising independently of the partnership relationship.

A partner maintaining a direct action under this section must plead and prove an actual or threatened injury that is not solely the result of an injury suffered or threatened to be suffered by the limited partnership.

A right to an accounting on a dissolution and winding up does not revive a claim barred by law.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-902. Derivative action.

A partner may maintain a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited partnership if:

The partner first makes a demand on the general partners, requesting that the general partners cause the limited partnership to bring an action to enforce the right, and the general partners do not bring the action within a reasonable time; or

A demand under subdivision (1) would be futile.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-903. Proper plaintiff.

A derivative action to enforce a right of a limited partnership may be maintained only by a person that:

Is a partner at the time the action is commenced; and

Either:

Was a partner when the conduct giving rise to the action occurred; or

Whose status as a partner devolved on the person by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the partnership agreement from a person that was a partner at the time of the conduct.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-904. Pleading.

In a derivative action, the complaint must state with particularity:

The date and content of plaintiff's demand and the response to the demand by the general partner; or

Why demand should be excused as futile.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-905. Special litigation committee.

If a limited partnership is named as or made a party in a derivative proceeding, the partnership may appoint a special litigation committee to investigate the claims asserted in the proceeding and determine whether pursuing the action is in the best interests of the limited partnership. If the limited partnership appoints a special litigation committee, on motion by the committee made in the name of the limited partnership, except for good cause shown, the court must stay discovery for the time reasonably necessary to permit the committee to make its investigation. This subsection (a) does not prevent the court from:

Enforcing a person's right to information under § 61-3-304 or § 61-3-407; or

Granting extraordinary relief in the form of a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction.

A special litigation committee must be composed of one (1) or more disinterested and independent individuals, who may be partners.

A special litigation committee may be appointed:

By a majority of the general partners not named as parties in the proceeding; or

If all general partners are named as parties in the proceeding, by a majority of the general partners named as defendants.

After appropriate investigation, a special litigation committee may determine that it is in the best interests of the limited partnership that the proceeding:

Continue under the control of the plaintiff;

Continue under the control of the committee;

Be settled on terms approved by the committee; or

Be dismissed.

After making a determination under subsection (d), a special litigation committee shall file with the court a statement of the committee's determination and report supporting the committee's determination and shall serve each party with a copy of the determination and report. The court shall determine whether the members of the committee were disinterested and independent and whether the committee conducted its investigation and made the committee's recommendation in good faith, independently, and with reasonable care, with the committee having the burden of proof. If the court finds that the members of the committee were disinterested and independent and that the committee acted in good faith, independently, and with reasonable care, the court must enforce the committee's determination. Otherwise, the court shall dissolve the stay of discovery entered under subsection (a) and allow the action to continue under the control of the plaintiff.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-906. Proceeds and expenses.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b):

Any proceeds or other benefits of a derivative action, whether by judgment, compromise, or settlement, belong to the limited partnership and not to the plaintiff; and

If the plaintiff receives any proceeds, the plaintiff must remit the proceeds immediately to the limited partnership.

If a derivative action is successful in whole or in part, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney's fees and costs, from the recovery of the limited partnership.

A derivative action on behalf of a limited partnership must not be voluntarily dismissed or settled without the court's approval.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.